Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 17

State Drug Crime Enforcement and Prosecution Grant Fund

12-17-101. Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Drug crime” means a misdemeanor or felony criminal offense prosecuted in district court or circuit court that violates:

Any provision of the Uniform Controlled Substances Act, § 5-64-401 et seq., or any solicitation, attempt, or conspiracy to violate the Uniform Controlled Substances Act, § 5-64-401 et seq.;

Any criminal violation of state law, or any solicitation, attempt, or conspiracy to violate state law, committed for the purpose of unlawfully acquiring, obtaining, manufacturing, purchasing, procuring, possessing, distributing, delivering, shipping, or transporting controlled substances, prescription drugs, drug paraphernalia, or precursor chemicals or components used to manufacture controlled substances;

Any criminal violation of state or federal law, or any solicitation, attempt, or conspiracy to violate state or federal law involving the use or possession of any fraudulent, falsified, forged, or altered identification card or document evidencing the identity of an individual, issued or purportedly issued by any state, federal, or foreign government, for the purpose of unlawfully acquiring, obtaining, manufacturing, purchasing, procuring, possessing, distributing, delivering, shipping, or transporting controlled substances, prescription drugs, drug paraphernalia, or precursor chemicals or components used to manufacture controlled substances;

Any criminal violation of state or federal law, or any solicitation, attempt, or conspiracy to violate state or federal law, for the purpose of committing any act that constitutes money laundering, as defined by § 5-42-204, of proceeds and profits related to violations of the Uniform Controlled Substances Act, § 5-64-401 et seq.; or

Any criminal violation of state or federal law or any solicitation, attempt, or conspiracy thereof, involving any firearm, deadly weapon, or explosive device used or possessed with intent to use:

To enforce or facilitate any criminal act defined under the Uniform Controlled Substances Act, § 5-64-401 et seq.; or

To commit a criminal offense defined by Arkansas law that intimidates, threatens, injures, maims, or kills any law enforcement officer, prosecutor, judicial officer, or any other court official, witness, informant, or juror involved in the investigation or prosecution of any violation of the Uniform Controlled Substances Act, § 5-64-401 et seq.;

“Investigate” means any law enforcement activities directed toward drug crimes, including without limitation prevention, eradication, investigation, and interdiction;

“Law enforcement agency” means:

Any county sheriff's office of any county in this state;

Any municipal police department of an organized city or town within this state; and

The Department of Arkansas State Police;

“Multi-jurisdictional drug crime task force” means an association consisting of a minimum of two (2) law enforcement agencies and one (1) prosecuting attorney acting by agreement to jointly investigate and prosecute drug crimes in a defined geographic area or judicial district; and

“Prosecuting attorney” means the elected prosecuting attorney for any judicial district, including without limitation appointed deputies and investigators.

History.

Acts 2007, No. 1086, § 1.

12-17-102. State Drug Crime Enforcement and Prosecution Grant Fund established.

There is hereby established and created on the books of the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, the Treasurer of State, and the Auditor of State a special revenue fund to be known as the “State Drug Crime Enforcement and Prosecution Grant Fund” for the purpose of funding state grant awards for multi-jurisdictional drug crime task forces to investigate and prosecute drug crimes within the State of Arkansas.

The fund shall consist of:

Revenues generated under § 12-17-106; and

Any moneys authorized by the General Assembly.

History.

Acts 2007, No. 1086, § 1.

12-17-103. Grant application and administration process.

The Department of Finance and Administration shall develop and promulgate grant applications under this chapter and upon the recommendations of the Arkansas Alcohol and Drug Abuse Coordinating Council.

The department shall administer all grant awards and expenditures under this chapter by the multi-jurisdictional drug crime task forces under applicable state and federal law.

History.

Acts 2007, No. 1086, § 1.

12-17-104. Determination of grant awards.

The Arkansas Alcohol and Drug Abuse Coordinating Council shall:

Develop and promulgate by rule criteria for the grant applications and awards process under this chapter;

Review all grant applications under this chapter;

Determine which applicant or applicants should receive grant awards under this chapter; and

Retain oversight of all grant expenditures under this chapter.

History.

Acts 2007, No. 1086, § 1.

12-17-105. Matching funds.

Any multi-jurisdictional drug crime task force receiving a grant award under this chapter shall contribute local matching funds in an amount not less than twenty percent (20%) of the total grant award.

The source of local matching funds shall be from county or municipal general revenue appropriations or authorized drug control fund disbursements of any participating multi-jurisdictional drug crime task force member agency.

The Department of Finance and Administration shall restrict distribution of any grant award to a multi-jurisdictional drug crime task force if it is determined that local matching funds are not appropriated or available.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment inserted “drug crime” in (b); and rewrote (c).

The 2011 amendment inserted “drug crime” twice in (c)(2).

Salaries;

Personal services matching;

Overtime;

Maintenance and general operations;

Evidentiary purchases of controlled substances or information;

Informant and witness compensation;

Rent;

Utilities;

Telecommunications;

Fuel;

Vehicle maintenance and repair;

In-state training; and

Travel expenses.

Cross References. Child Maltreatment Investigations Oversight Committee, §10-3-3201 et seq.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, No. 556, § 7: Mar. 26, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention currently estimates that five hundred fifty-one (551) girls or women in Arkansas are at the risk of, or have undergone, female genital mutilation; that female genital mutilation is recognized globally as a human rights violation; and that this legislation is immediately needed tohelp the women of Arkansas as soon as possible. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto”.

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

History.

Acts 2007, No. 1086, § 1.

12-17-106. Drug crime special assessment.

There is hereby established a drug crime special assessment to be levied by the district courts or circuit courts of this state in the sum of one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125) against any person who is convicted of or enters a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to any felony or misdemeanor offense the court determines to be a drug crime.

The drug crime special assessment shall be collected by the entity or office designated to collect fines and costs within the jurisdiction.

(1) All drug crime special assessments collected shall be remitted by the county official, city official, agency, or department designated in §16-13-709 as primarily responsible for the collection of fines assessed in the circuit courts or district courts on or before the fifteenth day of each month to the Administration of Justice Funds Section of the Office of Administrative Services of the Department of Finance and Administration, for deposit into the State Drug Crime Enforcement and Prosecution Grant Fund, as established by §12-17-102.

A form provided by the section identifying the amount of the drug crime special assessments shall be transmitted with the collected drug crime special assessments.

History.

Acts 2007, No. 1086, § 1; 2009, No. 165, § 13; 2011, No. 779, § 14.

12-17-107. Specific use of grant awards.

Grant awards under this chapter shall be used specifically for:

Each grant award shall specifically provide for accounting and fiscal officer services.

No grant awards shall be used for capital outlay or equipment purchases that exceed a cost of one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) per item.

History.

Acts 2007, No. 1086, § 1.